Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.210

Superintendent—Appointment—Salary.

The board of trustees shall appoint a superintendent who shall be appointed for an indefinite time and be removable at the will of the board of trustees. Appointments and removals shall be by resolution, introduced at a regular meeting and adopted at a subsequent regular meeting by a majority vote. The superintendent shall receive such salary as the board of trustees shall fix by resolution.

[ 1984 c 26 s 18; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.210. Prior: 1945 c 118 s 1, part; 1931 c 139 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 6090-15, part.]